Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB671.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 16 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "statewide-elected official" means any of the following:
(a) The Governor;
(b) The Lieutenant Governor;
(c) The Secretary of State;
(d) The Attorney General;
(e) The Auditor of Public Accounts;
(f) The State Treasurer;
(g) The Commissioner of Agriculture;
(h) A justice of the Supreme Court;
(i) A Court of Appeals judge;
(j) A Circuit Court judge;
(k) A District Court judge;
(l) A state senator of the General Assembly; or
(m) A state representative of the General Assembly.
(2) Upon receipt of a credible threat to kill or seriously injure a statewide-elected
official, the department or an agency designated by the department shall:
(a) Immediately investigate and conduct an assessment of the veracity of the
threat; and
(b) After the assessment, if it determines that the threat is a viable threat,
identify ways to mitigate or eliminate the threat by:
1. Working with local law enforcement;
2. Conducting arrests;
3. Providing security detail to the statewide-elected official who received
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/17/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1091
the threat; or
4. Any other mitigation tactics.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/17/2026 7:08 PM Jacketed